Maine, session 132, LD1641.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 36 MRSA §1811, sub-§3 is enacted to read:
3. Local option sales tax. A municipality may impose a local option sales tax of up
to 0.5% on the sale of any good or service authorized to be taxed under this chapter by
municipal referendum held on the first Tuesday in November. The referendum question
must include language describing what the revenue from the tax is to be used for. A local
option sales tax under this subsection may be imposed only on a year-round basis.